Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 29

Inmates of State Facilities

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 1151, § 4, provided:

“Establishment of a study.

“(a)The Department of Finance and Administration or other appropriate state agency designated by the Governor shall explore the feasibility of the state's assuming responsibility for limiting liability for a business or other commercial or nonprofit enterprise that knowingly employs ex-offenders.

“(b)If the limiting of liability proves feasible and prudent, the Department of Finance and Administration or other appropriate agency designated by the Governor shall promulgate rules and regulations for implementation of a practice allowing the limitation of liability.

“(c)Authority to determine feasibility and prudence under this section rests solely with the Department of Finance and Administration or other appropriate state agency designated by the Governor.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1933, No. 30, § 37, provided, in part, that laws not inconsistent with, or specifically repealed by, Acts 1933, No. 30 should apply to the Board of Penal Institutions.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 44, provided, in part, that all laws relating to the State Penitentiary which were not specifically repealed by, or in conflict with, Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50 would apply to the Department of Correction.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1887, No. 113, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 71: effective on passage.

Acts 1967, No. 474, § 4: Apr. 4, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent investigations of the State Penitentiary have pointed up the need for improved laws to impose stronger penalties on inmates in the penitentiary who violate the laws, rules and regulations governing the penitentiary; that a number of inmates at the penitentiary have been in possession of amounts of cash in excess of the amounts authorized by the regulations of the State Penitentiary Board, and that such amounts of cash have often led to abuses and disorder in the penitentiary, and that immediate passage of this act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 475, § 4: Apr. 4, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent investigations at the State Penitentiary called attention to the need to strengthen the laws of this state to prevent abuses at the penitentiary and to promote discipline and order at the penitentiary; and, that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to impose adequate safeguards against abuses at the penitentiary. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 477, § 4: Apr. 4, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Penitentiary is in the vicinity of Jefferson and Lincoln Counties; that the quick apprehension of escaped convicts before life or property is destroyed requires that the law enforcement officials in these counties be notified immediately of any prison escapes; and that in order to remedy this situation, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1969, No. 377, § 13: Apr. 9, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that persons under the age of 21 years who are convicted of a felony in this state, must now be committed to the Department of Correction, thereby severely minimizing the opportunities of rehabilitation of such persons, and that immediate steps must be taken to provide for the establishment of an intermediate reformatory wherein educational opportunities for training, education and rehabilitation training may be established for the benefit of such convicted felons. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 737, § 3: Apr. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that this act is essential to the operation of the Department of Correction and that in the event of a delay that the proper administration in providing transportation for inmates for court appearances could work irreparable harm on the effectiveness of the courts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 56, § 2: Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the above mentioned act is outdated and unnecessary as more sophisticated methods in law enforcement techniques are now employed by the Department of Correction and law enforcement agencies throughout the state; that the Department of Correction has a solid record of apprehending escaped prisoners in concerted efforts with all Arkansas county and local law enforcement officials; that there is no need to limit the notification of only the sheriffs of Jefferson, Lincoln, and Pulaski Counties and the Police Chief of Little Rock as the above mentioned act calls for. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 58, § 7: approved Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order to better effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crimes and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to facilitate these reforms. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 59, § 4: Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present custody classification of prisoners is quite ambiguous and difficult to implement; that this act is necessary to correct such deficiency in the law. It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law which requires physicals to be given twice a year is arbitrary and unnecessary and a waste of taxpayer money; that physicals should be given as often as needed as determined by the medical staff of the Department of Correction as this act requires. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 60, § 3: Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law regarding the furnishing of an inmate with liquor results in a maximum fine of only one hundred dollars ($100) and up to 10 days in jail; that this law is badly outdated and needs modernization; that such offense is very serious and the consequences could be devastating; that the offense should be reclassified as a Class D felony and should include ‘drugs’ in the definition. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 107, § 4: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 7 of Act 377 of 1969 needs immediate amending because of the present requirement of the Department of Correction to transport an inmate to his former home or to the county in which he was committed; that this is an expensive and unnecessary financial burden on the taxpayers of this State; that all that is needed is for the Department of Correction to transport the inmate to the closest commercial transportation pick-up point. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 790, § 3: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that inmates in the Department of Correction, who damage or destroy state property, are not now required to pay restitution to the department for damages to state property; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to enable the Department of Correction to recover from money available to the inmate, the restitution of damages caused by actions of the acts of an inmate, and the immediate passage of this act is necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 686, § 3: Mar. 27, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the penalties prescribed in the present law are inadequate to deter introduction of prohibited articles in certain facilities; that this act is designed to correct this deficiency and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 4 and No. 23, § 4: July 15, 1988. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present provisions do not allow persons incarcerated in the Department of Correction to properly exercise their religious beliefs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1487, § 5: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the law providing that certain inmates should not be eligible to participate in furlough programs does not include persons convicted of murder in the first degree; that it is imperative that persons convicted of murder in the first degree be prevented from participation in such programs because they present a real and present danger to society; and that immediate passage of this act is necessary to protect the public peace, health and safety of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-29-101. Custody classifications and treatment programs.

The Director of the Division of Correction shall formulate and establish a system by which all prisoners delivered to and in the care and custody of the Division of Correction shall be classified according to deportment.

In this classification, consideration shall be given to the prisoner's demeanor while in the division's care and custody and the prisoner's record prior to commitment to the division.

Persons committed to the institutional care of the division shall be dealt with humanely with efforts directed to their rehabilitation.

For these purposes, the division may establish programs of classification and diagnosis, education, casework, counseling and psychiatric therapy, vocational training and guidance, work, library and religious services, and other rehabilitation programs or services as may be indicated.

The division shall also institute procedures for the study and classification of inmates.

With the approval of the Board of Corrections, the director shall establish rules for the assignment of inmates to the various programs, services, and work activities of the division.

Inmates in the institutions of the division may participate in and benefit from the vocational, educational, and rehabilitation services of their respective institutions solely within the rules of the division as determined by the director, subject to appeal and review by the Board of Corrections or a designated review board in accordance with procedures that shall be established by the Board of Corrections.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d)(1) and (d)(2).

Cited: Finney v. Ark. Bd. of Corr., 505 F.2d 194 (8th Cir. 1974).

History.

Acts 1943, No. 157, § 1; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 8; 1981, No. 58, § 1; 1981, No. 59, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-116, 46-136; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 891.

12-29-102. Inmates denied participation in furlough programs.

A person who is convicted of any of the following offenses shall be ineligible to participate in any meritorious furlough program conducted by or for the Division of Correction:

Capital murder, § 5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;

Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;

Rape, § 5-14-103;

Any other offense concerning sexual offenses under § 5-14-101 et seq.;

An offense concerning sexual exploitation of children under the Arkansas Protection of Children Against Exploitation Act of 1979, § 5-27-301 et seq.;

An offense concerning use of children in sexual performances under § 5-27-401 et seq.; or

Stalking, § 5-71-229.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-29-102, concerning women inmates, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 658, § 2. The former section was derived from Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 8; 1981, No. 58, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-116.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language of the section.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1191, § 1; 1999, No. 1487, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 785.

12-29-103. Discipline.

The Director of the Division of Correction or the Director of the Division of Community Correction shall prescribe, with the approval of the Board of Corrections, rules for the maintenance of good order and discipline in the facilities and institutions of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction, respectively, including proceedings for dealing with violations.

These rules shall require that inmates found guilty of damaging or destroying state property shall be ordered to pay restitution.

This restitution shall be collected by levying against the inmate's institutional account. The levy against the inmate's institutional account shall continue until the estimated damage to state property has been fully paid or until the inmate is released from incarceration, whichever occurs first.

In case of riot or other violent conduct or behavior on the part of any inmate or group of inmates, the Director of the Division of Correction may take such steps as are necessary, including the use of force and arms as necessary, to restore discipline and order.

The Director of the Division of Correction may seek the assistance of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the National Guard, and local and federal law enforcement agencies in preserving order whenever the circumstances justify.

The Director of the Division of Correction shall provide for a record of charges of infractions by inmates, including any punishment imposed, and shall also keep a record of all medical inspections made.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted “or the Director of the Department of Community Correction” and substituted “Correction or the Department of Community Correction, respectively” for “Corrections.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

Disciplining of inmates may not include corporal punishment. Jackson v. Bishop, 404 F.2d 571 (8th Cir. 1968) (decision under prior law).

Trustees may not be authorized to inflict summary punishment upon fellow prisoners under their charge. Jackson v. Bishop, 404 F.2d 571 (8th Cir. 1968) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 10; 1983, No. 790, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-118; Acts 2009, No. 366, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 892.

12-29-104. Contacts with persons outside the institution.

Under rules prescribed by the Division of Correction, heads of the institutions of the division may authorize:

Visits and correspondence, under reasonable conditions, between inmates and approved friends, relatives, and others;

Temporary release of an inmate for such occasions as the serious illness or death of a member of the inmate's family; or

An interview of the inmate by a prospective employer.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language, substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department”.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-119; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 786.

12-29-105. Clergy.

All clergy of every denomination shall be admitted free to a Department of Correction prison or may visit any inmate confined therein, subject to such rules as may be necessary to the good government and discipline of the prison, and may administer the rites and ceremonies of the church to which the clergy belong if the inmate desires it.

The Director of the Department of Correction shall afford every facility to a clergy to visit an inmate and to administer rites, ceremonies, and spiritual consolation to an inmate within the rules of the prison.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “and the physician” following “Department of Correction” in (b).

The 2013 amendment substituted “inmate” for “convict” throughout the section.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be affected by §5-54-119.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmate” for “convict” in (a); and “inmates” for “convicts” in (b).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “A violation of this section is an unclassified” for “Whoever shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a” preceding “misdemeanor”, substituted “punishable by a fine” for “and shall on conviction be fined”, inserted a comma following “($100)”, substituted “imprisonment” for “or imprisoned in the county jail”, and deleted “fined and imprisoned” at the end.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 58, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9686; Pope's Dig., § 12719; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-149; Acts 2011, No. 779, § 23; 2013, No. 295, § 1.

12-29-106. Mail to or from inmates.

(1)A person without the consent of the Director of the Division of Correction shall not bring into or carry out of a prison any letter or writing to or from any inmate.

A violation of this section is an unclassified misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

However, all inmates shall have the privilege, under the proper supervision and inspection of the director or his or her employees, to write and receive letters from their relations and friends.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 53, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9714; Pope's Dig., § 12745; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-168; Acts 2013, No. 295, § 2; 2017, No. 250, § 23; 2019, No. 910, § 787.

12-29-107. Inmate welfare funds.

Amounts held as inmate welfare funds or received as inmate welfare funds through contributions, profit from sale of products to inmates, or otherwise, shall be held as a special fund to be administered and used by the Director of the Division of Correction for the general benefit of the inmates under rules to be established by the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 39; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-122; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 893.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

12-29-108. Cash in possession of inmate — Confiscation.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to promulgate rules concerning the maximum amount of cash that inmates of the Division of Correction may have in their possession.

The board shall provide adequate facilities for the deposit and safekeeping of cash belonging to inmates at the division if the inmate desires to deposit it for safekeeping.

An inmate of the division shall forfeit any cash found on his or her person or in his or her possession in excess of the amount prescribed by rules of the board.

After a hearing, the Director of the Division of Correction shall confiscate such cash and deposit the amount held in violation of the rules into a division welfare fund, to be used for the benefit of inmates of the division pursuant to rules of the board.

A complete record of all funds forfeited and confiscated shall be maintained by the director.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a); deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (c)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” twice in (c)(2).

Cross References. Allocation of inmate's earnings; inmate funds, §12-30-406.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 474, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-178; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 894, 895.

12-29-109. Board action upon violations of § 5-54-119.

If the Board of Corrections has good reason for believing that any violation of §5-54-119 has occurred, it shall investigate the matter and report the facts together with the names of the witnesses to the proper prosecuting attorney.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, §§ 51, 52, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9712, 9713; Pope's Dig., §§ 12743, 12744; Acts 1975, No. 280, § 2819; 1977, No. 360, § 17; 1981, No. 60, § 1; 1985, No. 686, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-2819, 46-166, 46-167; Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 3; 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 23, § 3; 2007, No. 827, § 129.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “Board action upon violations of §5-54-119” for “Furnishing liquor, etc., to inmates” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

12-29-110. Selling or trading position, working condition, or promotion — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any inmate or employee of the Division of Correction or any other person to sell, barter, or trade, or to promise or offer to sell, barter, or trade any favored job or position, working condition, or any promotion or demotion in any job or position at the division and to:

Accept or receive any money, consideration, or thing of value therefor;

Make or accept any loan or money as inducement thereof; or

Accept or receive any favored condition or job or position at the division either directly or indirectly as a result thereof.

A violation of this section is an unclassified felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years.

If the person convicted under this section is an inmate in the division, the sentence shall commence to run from the expiration of the sentence under which the person is serving at the time of the violation of this section.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “It is” for “It shall be” in the introductory language of (a); in (b)(1), substituted “A violation of this section is an unclassified” for “Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a” preceding “felony” and “punishable by imprisonment” for “and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in the department”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “convicted under this section” for “so convicted” and added “of this section”.

The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department”; and substituted“division” for “department” in (a)(3) and (b)(2).

The county sheriff's office is responsible for the custody, sustenance, and safety of the inmate from the time the inmate is placed into its custody until the time custody of the inmate is returned to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

The county in which the legal proceeding is held is responsible for all expenses relating to the transportation and care of the inmate.

While transporting an inmate under this section, a county sheriff has the full authority of his or her office in any county of this state in matters relating to the transportation.

This section does not apply to the transportation and care costs for court appearances arising from charges brought by the Division of Correction against the inmate for offenses committed while the inmate is under the custody and care of the Division of Correction.

When an inmate in the care and custody of the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction is required to be present for appearances in a civil proceeding that does not arise from a criminal charge or conviction, the court requiring the inmate's presence may assess costs against one (1) or more of the parties to the proceeding to be paid to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction to compensate the actual cost of transporting the inmate and to compensate other costs assessed by the court.

Costs under this subsection shall not be assessed against the Department of Human Services if the Department of Human Services is a party to the proceeding.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “or the Department of Community Correction” in (a).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout the section.

Cited: McGee v. Rankin, 584 F. Supp. 1202 (W.D. Ark. 1984).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 788, § 1, provided:

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-28-101(a)(2) authorizes the Department of Correction to provide education and other rehabilitation and treatment programs designed to prepare inmates committed to the department for productive and law-abiding lives upon release from the Department of Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-301 establishes the Department of Corrections School System to provide elementary, secondary, and vocational and technical education to qualified persons incarcerated in the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction and qualified persons supervised by the Department of Community Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-101(d)(2) provides that inmates in the institutions of the Department of Correction may participate in and benefit from the vocational, educational, and rehabilitation services of their respective institutions solely within the rules and regulations of the department as determined by the director, subject to appeal and review by the Board of Corrections or a designated review board in accordance with procedures that shall be established by the board; and

“Whereas, the Corrections School System along with the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction have entered into agreements to provide college courses to qualified persons under Administrative Regulation 500 which are taught onsite by accredited college and universities.”

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (d).

The 2013 amendment deleted former (c) and redesignated former (d) as (c).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

State's actions in releasing and transporting inmate to a person's store, without a warning he was dangerous, did not deprive storeowner of her life and infringe her liberty interest in personal security in violation of her substantive due process rights. Wells v. Walker, 852 F.2d 368 (8th Cir. 1988), cert. denied, 489 U.S. 1012, 109 S. Ct. 1121, 103 L. Ed. 2d 184 (1989).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1).

Cross References. Escapes, §§5-54-110 —5-54-112.

Victim notification system, §12-12-1201 et seq.

Attempt to escape; or

Resist any lawful demand.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “convicts” and “inmate” for “convict” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 475, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-179, 46-180; Acts 2017, No. 250, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 788.

12-29-111. Transport of inmate required for legal proceeding.

If an inmate in the care and custody of the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction is required to be present during a criminal proceeding or a civil proceeding that arises from a criminal charge or conviction of any court in this state, the county sheriff of the county in which the criminal proceeding or civil proceeding takes place shall take custody of the inmate at the institution where the inmate is confined, transport the inmate to the appropriate county, and make him or her available to the court.

At the conclusion of the criminal proceeding or civil proceeding, the county sheriff shall transport the inmate back to the unit of the Division of Correction or Division of Community Correction from which the inmate was received and shall return custody of the inmate to the Division of Correction or Division of Community Correction officials.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 737, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-181; Acts 2009, No. 364, § 1; 2013, No. 287, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 789.

12-29-112. Discharge or release.

At least one hundred twenty (120) days before an inmate's anticipated release date, the Division of Correction, in collaboration with the inmate and the Division of Community Correction and the Parole Board, shall complete a prerelease assessment and reentry plan, which may include a travel subsidy and transportation to the closest commercial transportation pick-up point.

A copy of the reentry plan under this section shall be provided to the inmate and the assigned parole officer, if applicable.

An inmate released upon completion of his or her terms of incarceration shall be provided:

Written and certified proof that he or she completed and satisfied all the terms of his or her incarceration; and

Information on how to reinstate his or her voting rights upon discharge of his or her sentence.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 15; 1969, No. 377, § 7; 1981, No. 58, § 3; 1981, No. 107, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-121, 46-914; Acts 2007, No. 271, § 1; 2009, No. 788, § 4; 2013, No. 440, § 1; 2015, No. 895, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 790.

12-29-113. Notice of escape to law enforcement officers — Penalty.

(1)Whenever any inmate of the Department of Correction shall escape from its custody, it shall be the duty of the Director of the Department of Correction or his or her designee to immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement officers in the area where the escape took place.

Notification of law enforcement officers in other areas of the state as well as surrounding states will be made as deemed necessary by the department.

A violation of any provision of this section shall be a violation and shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History.

Acts 1887, No. 113, §§ 1, 4, p. 203; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9690, 9708; Pope's Dig., §§ 12722, 12739; Acts 1967, No. 477, § 1; 1981, No. 56, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-160, 46-161; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 78.

12-29-114. Notice of escape to victim or victim's next of kin.

(1)Whenever an inmate serving a sentence for the commission of a crime escapes from the custody of the Division of Correction, it shall be the responsibility of the division to immediately notify the victim of the crime or the victim's next of kin of the inmate's escape.

However, the victim of the crime or the victim's next of kin will not be notified by the division unless a request for the notification has previously been delivered in writing to the division.

(1)When notice of an escape is given by the division, it shall be conveyed by telephone whenever possible and otherwise in writing to the last known address of the victim or the victim's next of kin.

It shall be the responsibility of the victim or the victim's next of kin to notify the division in writing of any future changes in the victim's or victim's next of kin address and telephone number.

It shall be the responsibility of the prosecuting attorney of the county from which the inmate was committed to notify the victim or the victim's next of kin that an address and telephone number may be provided to the division, and the procedure by which to supply information, for the purpose of notification should the inmate escape.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 428, §§ 1-3; 1985, No. 470, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-161.1 — 46-161.3; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 791.

12-29-115. Combination to escape — Authority of guards.

The officers and guards of the Division of Correction shall use all lawful and suitable means to defend themselves, secure the persons of offenders, and prevent attempted violence and escape whenever two (2) or more inmates shall combine for the following purposes or whenever one (1) or more inmates shall:

Offer violence to any officer, guard, or inmate;

Do or attempt to do any injury to any building, workshop, or appurtenance thereto;

If any of the officers or guards employed in the division shall, in the attempt to prevent the escape of any inmate, any attempt to retake any inmate who may have escaped, or in the attempt to suppress any riot, revolt, or insurrection, take the life of any inmate, the officer or guard shall not be held responsible therefor unless it is done unnecessarily or wantonly.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 49, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9691; Pope's Dig., § 12723; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-163; 2013, No. 295, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 792.

12-29-116. Authority of director in case of alarm or danger.

The Director of the Department of Correction shall have the authority of a county sheriff over the power of the county in which a Department of Correction's prison or inmate camp is situated in all cases of alarm or danger at the prison or inmate camp, in the absence of the county sheriff or the county sheriff's inability to act.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 56, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9724; Pope's Dig., § 12755; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-164; 2013, No. 295, § 4.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmate” for “convict”.

12-29-117. Educational, training, and rehabilitative programs.

An inmate who was convicted and sentenced as an adult for an offense he or she committed before he or she attained eighteen (18) years of age shall not be prevented from participating in an educational, training, or rehabilitative program that is otherwise available to other inmates in the general population of the correctional facility in which he or she is housed.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 821, § 1.